Utah statutes.
63M-1-1223.   Permissible investments.

Investments by designated investors in the Utah fund of funds are permissible investments under applicable laws of the state for:

(1)  state-chartered banks;

(2)  state-chartered savings and loan associations;

(3)  state-chartered credit unions;

(4)  state-chartered industrial banks; and

(5)  domestic insurance companies.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

